Sidath/files/a4.foma
### Sinhala.foma ###

# Vowels
define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය | ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ය | ව ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ත ි | ෙ හ ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ ];


read lexc a4.lexc
define Lexicon;


define AgayaClass          අ -> ඇ || .#. _ ?*  "^" B ;
define UyaClass            උ -> ඉ || .#. _ ?*  "^" B ;
define OthaClass           ඔ -> එ || .#. _ ?*  "^" B ;
define KotaClass         ො -> ෙ || .#. A _ ?*  "^" B ;
define SoodaClass        ෝ -> ේ || .#. A _ ?*  "^" B ;
define PaadaClass          ා -> ෑ || .#. A _ ?*  "^" B ;
define DuwaClass           ු -> ි || .#. A _ ?*  "^" B ;


define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassOneGrammar 	Lexicon            .o.
                        AgayaClass         .o.
                        UyaClass           .o.
                        OthaClass          .o.
                        KotaClass          .o.
                        SoodaClass         .o.
                        PaadaClass         .o.
                        DuwaClass          .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassOneGrammar;
